Nebraska, session 109, LB1000.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1000 LB1000
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 26-118, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
26-118 (1) Any person, except the petitioner, who knowingly violates
a protection order issued pursuant to the Protection Orders Act, after
service or notice as described in subsection (4) of section 26-114, or a
valid foreign protection order recognized pursuant to section 26-123 or
26-124, shall be guilty of an offense and punished as provided in this
section.
(2) For a violation involving a domestic abuse protection order, a
sexual assault protection order, a valid foreign domestic abuse
protection order recognized pursuant to section 26-123, or a valid
foreign sexual assault protection order recognized pursuant to section
26-124, a violation of this section is a:
(a) Class I misdemeanor for a first offense; and a
(b) Class IV felony for a any second or subsequent offense; .
(c) Class IIIA felony for a third offense; and
(d) Class IIA felony for any fourth or subsequent offense.
(3) For a violation of a harassment protection order or a valid
foreign harassment protection order recognized pursuant to section
26-124, a violation of this section is a Class II misdemeanor for a first
offense and a Class I misdemeanor for any second or subsequent offense.
Sec. 2. Original section 26-118, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025,
is repealed.
-2-